New Jersey, session 221, S3435.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 4 of P.L.1995, c.112 (C.39:8-44) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.         The State Treasurer shall either: (1)   Assign to the State the full responsibility for the design, construction, renovation, equipment, establishment, maintenance, and operation of official inspection facilities and other aspects of the inspection and maintenance program, including safety inspections; (2)   Enter into a contract or contracts with a private contractor or contractors for the design, construction, renovation, equipment, establishment, maintenance, and operation of official inspection facilities and other aspects of the inspection and maintenance program, including safety inspections; or (3)   Assign to the State partial responsibility and enter into a contract or contracts with a private contractor or contractors for the remaining responsibility for the design, construction, renovation, equipment, establishment, maintenance, and operation of official inspection facilities and other aspects of the inspection and maintenance program, including safety inspections. The State Treasurer shall choose one of the options pursuant to this subsection based on a determination of the best interests of the citizens of New Jersey.  At least seven business days prior to the award of a contract that includes the operation or maintenance of an official inspection facility pursuant to this section, the State Treasurer shall issue a notice of intent to award the contract and shall submit to the Legislature the notice of intent and a report describing the option chosen, which shall include an economic analysis of the three options listed in this subsection with respect to the operation or maintenance portion of the contract. b.    (1) A contract authorized by this section may, subject to the provisions of subsection f. of R.S.39:8-2, include the purchase, lease or sale of an interest in real or personal property.  The State Treasurer is authorized to exercise all authority of the Directors of the Division of Purchase and Property and of the Division of Building and Construction to award the contract or contracts authorized by this section as a single contract, multiple branch contracts or multiple single contracts.  Any contract awarded pursuant to this section shall be awarded in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to that act.  The provisions of R.S.52:32-2 shall not apply to any contract authorized by this section. (2)   Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 35 of Title 52 of the Revised Statutes, the State Treasurer is not required to limit bids to persons who are prequalified.  The State Treasurer is authorized to require each person who submits a bid for a contract pursuant to this section to submit statements under oath in response to a questionnaire that develops fully that person's financial ability, adequacy of plant and equipment, organization, prior experience and any other facts pertinent and material to qualification, including qualification of any subcontractors, for the contract sought.  Any such questionnaire required shall be standardized with respect to, and shall be set forth in, each invitation to bid. (3)   Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, and subject to guidelines for conflict of interest established by the Attorney General, for the purposes of this section a State officer or employee or a group of State officers or employees may enter into a contract or contracts as a private contractor.  A State officer or employee having any duties or responsibilities in connection with the evaluation or awarding of a contract pursuant to this section shall not individually or through any person or entity acting on behalf of that officer or employee bid on or enter into a contract as a private contractor. (4)   A contractor for the operation of an official inspection facility, or any of its officers or employees, may not be engaged in the business of selling, maintaining, or repairing motor vehicles or selling motor vehicle replacement or repair parts. A contractor's employees shall not be deemed employees of the State for any purpose. c.     A contract for the operation of an official inspection facility shall provide for motor vehicle inspection services that are consumer-friendly to the maximum extent feasible. A contract shall at a minimum specify that: (1)   New or relocated inspection facilities shall be sited close to population centers, but in locations that remain convenient for suburban and rural residents; (2)   An inspection facility shall be open for inspections, exclusive of holidays, at least 55 hours each week, including hours prior to 9:00 am or after 5:00 pm on weekdays and hours on the weekend, except that the facility may lessen or expand these hours based on the results of a survey of persons who use the facility for motor vehicle inspections; (3)   An inspection facility shall maintain a climate-controlled waiting area for persons whose motor vehicles are being inspected; (4)   At least one lane at each inspection facility shall be reserved to the extent practicable for reinspections, although this lane may be opened to initial inspections whenever there are no reinspections being performed; (5)   The number of inspection lanes provided for in the contract to be constructed may be increased to meet the standards set by the [director] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to subsection d. of this section only if the contractor can show that this increase is more cost-effective than extending the hours of operation; (6)   A toll-free telephone number and a network of computerized signs shall be established, and public service announcements shall be aired to advise motorists of the length of lines at inspection facilities.  Periodic surveys concerning hours and methods of operation shall be conducted.  Each motor vehicle operator who arrives at a facility for an inspection shall be provided with a written document containing the following statement: "The motor vehicle emission test being conducted at this facility has been imposed on the residents of this State by an act of the Congress of the United States and the regulations of the United States Environmental Protection Agency." In addition, the written document shall include the name and address of the Administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency and of each member of Congress elected from this State. A contractor shall spend not less than one percent of its operating budget to provide an ongoing public information program; and (7)   All qualified full-time employees whose employment with the [division] New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission is terminated as a result of P.L.1995, c.112 (C.39:8-41 et al.) shall be offered full-time employment.  If more than one contract for the operation of official inspection facilities is awarded, each contractor shall offer full-time employment to a percentage of the number of such employees that is equal to the percentage of the total number of inspection lanes that will be operated by that contractor. d.    The [director] chief administrator shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), regulations to establish the conduct of inspections by any person who has entered into a contract with the State pursuant to subsection a. of this section, and may issue directives or guidelines or enter into contracts or agreements for the oversight and regulation of any person who has entered into a contract with the State pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The [director] chief administrator shall establish standards that are designed to achieve average wait times of 30 minutes or less and to keep the overall operating cost of the facilities to a minimum. The [director] chief administrator shall develop a system of incentives that are designed to achieve average wait times of 15 minutes or less.  Data generated at any official inspection facility shall be the property of the State and shall be fully accessible to the [division] New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission at any time. e.     If a dispute over contract compliance, performance or termination cannot be resolved by the State Treasurer and the private contractor pursuant to the procedures set forth in a contract entered into pursuant to the provisions of this section, either party to the contract may file with the Superior Court a request either for an order either to terminate the contract or for an order for other appropriate relief to the dispute.  Any provision of N.J.S.59:13-5 to the contrary notwithstanding, the State Treasurer may consent to the filing of such a request prior to the expiration of 90 days from the date that the notice of claim is received.  The court may take such action as it may deem necessary to facilitate the expeditious resolution of the dispute and an expeditious response to the request, including ordering the parties to undertake dispute resolution, mediation, or arbitration as provided in N.J.S.59:13-7.  Within 90 days after the filing of a request, the court shall either grant the request or deny the request.  If the request is granted, the court shall order such appropriate relief measures or remedies as it deems appropriate and necessary. f.     (1) A person whose employment with the [Division of Motor Vehicles] New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission is terminated as a result of a contract entered into pursuant to subsection a. of this section, who does not accept an offer of employment with a contractor pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection c. of this section, and who undergoes counseling pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-7), may apply for a training grant pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-6). (2)   Any provision of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-1 et al.) to the contrary notwithstanding, the Workforce Development Program in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may provide a training grant to each person who applies pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection for a training grant to pay for employment and training services as provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-6). g.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, during any contract renewal involving the operation of an official inspection facility within this State, existing employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be the first to be offered employment to meet the staffing requirements of the new contract.  Offers of employment to both existing and new employees shall include compensation and benefits packages that meet the requirements of any collective bargaining agreement that may be in place for the existing contract. In the event of a sale, transfer of assets including contracts, or in the event of a merger with another company, the collective bargaining agreement in effect at the time shall be binding on any successors and assigns, including all purchasers of any assets, contracts, or the business.  The collective bargaining agreement shall be binding on any and all corporations, partnerships, organizations, and sole proprietorships affiliated with or related to doing business under the terms of the collective bargaining agreement in effect. (cf: P.L.1995, c.112, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.